Illinois, session 104th, HB1280.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4Article 1. General Provisions 5    Section 101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 6Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act. 7    Section 102. Definitions. In this Act:8        (1) "Adult" means an individual who has attained 18 9    years of age or an emancipated minor.10        (2) "Caretaking authority" means the right to live 11    with and care for a child on a day-to-day basis. 12    "Caretaking authority" includes physical custody, 13    parenting time, right to access, and visitation.14        (3) "Child" means:15            (A) an unemancipated individual who has not 16        attained 18 years of age; or17            (B) an adult son or daughter by birth or adoption, 18        or under law of this State other than this Act, who is 19        the subject of a court order concerning custodial 20        responsibility.21        (4) "Court" means a tribunal, including an 22    administrative agency, authorized under law of this State   HB1280- 2 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1    other than this Act to make, enforce, or modify a decision 2    regarding custodial responsibility.3        (5) "Custodial responsibility" includes all powers and 4    duties relating to caretaking authority and 5    decision-making authority for a child. "Custodial 6    responsibility" includes physical custody, legal custody, 7    parenting time, right to access, visitation, and authority 8    to grant limited contact with a child.9        (6) "Decision-making authority" means the power to 10    make important decisions regarding a child, including 11    decisions regarding the child's education, religious 12    training, health care, extracurricular activities, and 13    travel. "Decision-making authority" does not include the 14    power to make decisions that necessarily accompany a grant 15    of caretaking authority.16        (7) "Deploying parent" means a service member, who is 17    deployed or has been notified of impending deployment and 18    is:19            (A) a parent of a child under law of this state 20        other than this Act; or21            (B) an individual who has custodial responsibility 22        for a child under law of this State other than this 23        Act;24        (8) "Deployment" means the movement or mobilization of 25    a service member for more than 90 days but less than 18 26    months pursuant to uniformed service orders that:  HB1280- 3 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1            (A) are designated as unaccompanied;2            (B) do not authorize dependent travel; or3            (C) otherwise do not permit the movement of family 4        members to the location to which the service member is 5        deployed.6        (9) "Family member" means a sibling, aunt, uncle, 7    cousin, stepparent, or grandparent of a child or an 8    individual recognized to be in a familial relationship 9    with a child under law of this State other than this Act.10        (10) "Limited contact" means the authority of a 11    nonparent to visit a child for a limited time. "Limited 12    contact" includes authority to take the child to a place 13    other than the residence of the child.14        (11) "Nonparent" means an individual other than a 15    deploying parent or other parent.16        (12) "Other parent" means an individual who, in common 17    with a deploying parent, is:18            (A) a parent of a child under law of this State 19        other than this Act; or20            (B) an individual who has custodial responsibility 21        for a child under law of this State other than this 22        Act.23        (13) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 24    tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or 25    other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.26        (14) "Return from deployment" means the conclusion of   HB1280- 4 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1    a service member's deployment as specified in uniformed 2    service orders.3        (15) "Service member" means a member of a uniformed 4    service.5        (16) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate 6    or adopt a record:7            (A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or8            (B) to attach to or logically associate with the 9        record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.10        (17) "State" means a state of the United States, the 11    District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States 12    Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession 13    subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.14        (18) "Uniformed service" means:15            (A) active and reserve components of the Army, 16        Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, or Coast 17        Guard of the United States;18            (B) the United States Merchant Marine;19            (C) the commissioned corps of the United States 20        Public Health Service;21            (D) the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic 22        and Atmospheric Administration of the United States; 23        or24            (E) the National Guard of a state. 25    Section 103. Remedies for noncompliance. In addition to   HB1280- 5 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1other remedies under law of this State other than this Act, if 2a court finds that a party to a proceeding under this Act has 3acted in bad faith or intentionally failed to comply with this 4Act or a court order issued under this Act, the court may 5assess reasonable attorney's fees and costs against the party 6and order other appropriate relief. 7    Section 104. Jurisdiction.8    (a) A court may issue an order regarding custodial 9responsibility under this Act only if the court has 10jurisdiction under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and 11Enforcement Act.12    (b) If a court has issued a temporary order regarding 13custodial responsibility pursuant to Article 3, the residence 14of the deploying parent is not changed by reason of the 15deployment for the purposes of the Uniform Child Custody 16Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act during the deployment.17    (c) If a court has issued a permanent order regarding 18custodial responsibility before notice of deployment and the 19parents modify that order temporarily by agreement pursuant to 20Article 2, the residence of the deploying parent is not 21changed by reason of the deployment for the purposes of the 22Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act.23    (d) If a court in another state has issued a temporary 24order regarding custodial responsibility as a result of 25impending or current deployment, the residence of the   HB1280- 6 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1deploying parent is not changed by reason of the deployment 2for the purposes of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and 3Enforcement Act.4    (e) This Section does not prevent a court from exercising 5temporary emergency jurisdiction under the Uniform Child 6Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act. 7    Section 105. Notification required of deploying parent.8    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) and 9subject to subsection (c), a deploying parent shall notify in 10a record the other parent of a pending deployment not later 11than 7 days after receiving notice of deployment unless 12reasonably prevented from doing so by the circumstances of 13service. If the circumstances of service prevent giving 14notification within the 7 days, the deploying parent shall 15give the notification as soon as reasonably possible.16    (b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) and 17subject to subsection (c), each parent shall provide in a 18record the other parent with a plan for fulfilling that 19parent's share of custodial responsibility during deployment. 20Each parent shall provide the plan as soon as reasonably 21possible after notification of deployment is given under 22subsection (a).23    (c) If a court order currently in effect prohibits 24disclosure of the address or contact information of the other 25parent, notification of deployment under subsection (a), or   HB1280- 7 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1notification of a plan for custodial responsibility during 2deployment under subsection (b), may be made only to the 3issuing court. If the address of the other parent is available 4to the issuing court, the court shall forward the notification 5to the other parent. The court shall keep confidential the 6address or contact information of the other parent.7    (d) Notification in a record under subsection (a) or (b) 8is not required if the parents are living in the same residence 9and both parents have actual notice of the deployment or plan.10    (e) In a proceeding regarding custodial responsibility, a 11court may consider the reasonableness of a parent's efforts to 12comply with this Section. 13    Section 106. Duty to notify of change of address.14    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), an 15individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted 16during deployment pursuant to Article 2 or 3 shall notify the 17deploying parent and any other individual with custodial 18responsibility of a child of any change of the individual's 19mailing address or residence until the grant is terminated. 20The individual shall provide the notice to any court that has 21issued a custody or child support order concerning the child 22which is in effect.23    (b) If a court order currently in effect prohibits 24disclosure of the address or contact information of an 25individual to whom custodial responsibility has been granted,   HB1280- 8 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1a notification under subsection (a) may be made only to the 2court that issued the order. The court shall keep confidential 3the mailing address or residence of the individual to whom 4custodial responsibility has been granted. 5    Section 107. General consideration in custody proceeding 6of parent's military service. In a proceeding for custodial 7responsibility of a child of a service member, a court may not 8consider a parent's past deployment or possible future 9deployment in itself in determining the best interests of the 10child but may consider any significant impact on the best 11interests of the child of the parent's past or possible future 12deployment. 13Article 2. Agreement Addressing Custodial Responsibilities 14During Deployment 15    Section 201. Form of agreement.16    (a) The parents of a child may enter into a temporary 17agreement under this Article granting custodial responsibility 18during deployment.19    (b) An agreement under subsection (a) must be:20        (1) in writing; and21        (2) signed by both parents and any nonparent to whom 22    custodial responsibility is granted.23    (c) Subject to subsection (d), an agreement under   HB1280- 9 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1subsection (a), if feasible, must:2        (1) identify the destination, duration, and conditions 3    of the deployment that is the basis for the agreement;4        (2) specify the allocation of caretaking authority 5    among the deploying parent, the other parent, and any 6    nonparent;7        (3) specify any decision-making authority that 8    accompanies a grant of caretaking authority;9        (4) specify any grant of limited contact to a 10    nonparent;11        (5) if under the agreement custodial responsibility is 12    shared by the other parent and a nonparent, or by other 13    nonparents, provide a process to resolve any dispute that 14    may arise;15        (6) specify the frequency, duration, and means, 16    including electronic means, by which the deploying parent 17    will have contact with the child, any role to be played by 18    the other parent in facilitating the contact, and the 19    allocation of any costs of contact;20        (7) specify the contact between the deploying parent 21    and child during the time the deploying parent is on leave 22    or is otherwise available;23        (8) acknowledge that any party's child-support 24    obligation cannot be modified by the agreement, and that 25    changing the terms of the obligation during deployment 26    requires modification in the appropriate court;  HB1280- 10 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1        (9) provide that the agreement will terminate 2    according to the procedures under Article 4 after the 3    deploying parent returns from deployment; and4        (10) if the agreement must be filed pursuant to 5    Section 205, specify which parent is required to file the 6    agreement.7    (d) The omission of any of the items specified in 8subsection (c) does not invalidate an agreement under this 9Section. 10    Section 202. Nature of authority created by agreement.11    (a) An agreement under this Article is temporary and 12terminates pursuant to Article 4 after the deploying parent 13returns from deployment, unless the agreement has been 14terminated before that time by court order or modification 15under Section 203. The agreement does not create an 16independent, continuing right to caretaking authority, 17decision-making authority, or limited contact in an individual 18to whom custodial responsibility is given.19    (b) A nonparent who has caretaking authority, 20decision-making authority, or limited contact by an agreement 21under this Article has standing to enforce the agreement until 22it has been terminated by court order, by modification under 23Section 203, or under Article 4. 24    Section 203. Modification of agreement.  HB1280- 11 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1    (a) By mutual consent, the parents of a child may modify an 2agreement regarding custodial responsibility made pursuant to 3this Article.4    (b) If an agreement is modified under subsection (a) 5before deployment of a deploying parent, the modification must 6be in writing and signed by both parents and any nonparent who 7will exercise custodial responsibility under the modified 8agreement.9    (c) If an agreement is modified under subsection (a) 10during deployment of a deploying parent, the modification must 11be agreed to in a record by both parents and any nonparent who 12will exercise custodial responsibility under the modified 13agreement. 14    Section 204. Power of attorney. A deploying parent, by 15power of attorney, may delegate all or part of custodial 16responsibility to an adult nonparent for the period of 17deployment if no other parent possesses custodial 18responsibility under law of this State other than this Act, or 19if a court order currently in effect prohibits contact between 20the child and the other parent. The deploying parent may 21revoke the power of attorney by signing a revocation of the 22power. 23    Section 205. Filing agreement or power of attorney with 24court. An agreement or power of attorney under this Article   HB1280- 12 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1must be filed within a reasonable time with any court that has 2entered an order on custodial responsibility or child support 3that is in effect concerning the child who is the subject of 4the agreement or power. The case number and heading of the 5pending case concerning custodial responsibility or child 6support must be provided to the court with the agreement or 7power. 8Article 3. Judicial Procedure for Granting Custodial 9Responsibility During Deployment 10    Section 301. Definition. In this Article, "close and 11substantial relationship" means a relationship in which a 12significant bond exists between a child and a nonparent. 13    Section 302. Proceeding for temporary custody order.14    (a) After a deploying parent receives notice of deployment 15and until the deployment terminates, a court may issue a 16temporary order granting custodial responsibility unless 17prohibited by the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. 18Appendix Sections 521 and 522. A court may not issue a 19permanent order granting custodial responsibility without the 20consent of the deploying parent.21    (b) At any time after a deploying parent receives notice 22of deployment, either parent may file a motion regarding 23custodial responsibility of a child during deployment. The   HB1280- 13 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1motion must be filed in a pending proceeding for custodial 2responsibility in a court with jurisdiction under Section 104 3or, if there is no pending proceeding in a court with 4jurisdiction under Section 104, in a new action for granting 5custodial responsibility during deployment. 6    Section 303. Expedited hearing. If a motion to grant 7custodial responsibility is filed under subsection (b) of 8Section 302 before a deploying parent deploys, the court shall 9conduct an expedited hearing. 10    Section 304. Testimony by electronic means. In a 11proceeding under this Article, a party or witness who is not 12reasonably available to appear personally may appear, provide 13testimony, and present evidence by electronic means unless the 14court finds good cause to require a personal appearance. 15    Section 305. Effect of prior judicial order or agreement. 16In a proceeding for a grant of custodial responsibility 17pursuant to this Article, the following rules apply:18        (1) A prior judicial order designating custodial 19    responsibility in the event of deployment is binding on 20    the court unless the circumstances meet the requirements 21    of law of this State other than this Act for modifying a 22    judicial order regarding custodial responsibility.23        (2) The court shall enforce a prior written agreement   HB1280- 14 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1    between the parents for designating custodial 2    responsibility in the event of deployment, including an 3    agreement executed under Article 2, unless the court finds 4    that the agreement is contrary to the best interests of 5    the child. 6    Section 306. Grant of caretaking or decision-making 7authority to nonparent.8    (a) On motion of a deploying parent and in accordance with 9law of this State other than this Act, if it is in the best 10interests of the child, a court may grant caretaking authority 11to a nonparent who is an adult family member of the child or an 12adult with whom the child has a close and substantial 13relationship.14    (b) Unless a grant of caretaking authority to a nonparent 15under subsection (a) is agreed to by the other parent, the 16grant is limited to an amount of time not greater than:17        (1) the amount of time granted to the deploying parent 18    under a permanent custody order, but the court may add 19    unusual travel time necessary to transport the child; or20        (2) in the absence of a permanent custody order that 21    is currently in effect, the amount of time that the 22    deploying parent habitually cared for the child before 23    being notified of deployment, but the court may add 24    unusual travel time necessary to transport the child.25    (c) A court may grant part of a deploying parent's   HB1280- 15 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1decision-making authority, if the deploying parent is unable 2to exercise that authority, to a nonparent who is an adult 3family member of the child or an adult with whom the child has 4a close and substantial relationship. If a court grants the 5authority to a nonparent, the court shall specify the 6decision-making powers granted, including decisions regarding 7the child's education, religious training, health care, 8extracurricular activities, and travel. 9    Section 307. Grant of limited contact. On motion of a 10deploying parent, and in accordance with law of this State 11other than this Act, unless the court finds that the contact 12would be contrary to the best interests of the child, a court 13shall grant limited contact to a nonparent who is a family 14member of the child or an individual with whom the child has a 15close and substantial relationship. 16    Section 308. Nature of authority created by temporary 17custody order.18    (a) A grant of authority under this Article is temporary 19and terminates under Article 4 after the return from 20deployment of the deploying parent, unless the grant has been 21terminated before that time by court order. The grant does not 22create an independent, continuing right to caretaking 23authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact in an 24individual to whom it is granted.  HB1280- 16 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1    (b) A nonparent granted caretaking authority, 2decision-making authority, or limited contact under this 3Article has standing to enforce the grant until it is 4terminated by court order or under Article 4. 5    Section 309. Content of temporary custody order.6    (a) An order granting custodial responsibility under this 7Article must:8        (1) designate the order as temporary; and9        (2) identify to the extent feasible the destination, 10    duration, and conditions of the deployment.11    (b) If applicable, an order for custodial responsibility 12under this Article must:13        (1) specify the allocation of caretaking authority, 14    decision-making authority, or limited contact among the 15    deploying parent, the other parent, and any nonparent;16        (2) if the order divides caretaking or decision-making 17    authority between individuals, or grants caretaking 18    authority to one individual and limited contact to 19    another, provide a process to resolve any dispute that may 20    arise;21        (3) provide for liberal communication between the 22    deploying parent and the child during deployment, 23    including through electronic means, unless contrary to the 24    best interests of the child, and allocate any costs of 25    communications;  HB1280- 17 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1        (4) provide for liberal contact between the deploying 2    parent and the child during the time the deploying parent 3    is on leave or otherwise available, unless contrary to the 4    best interests of the child;5        (5) provide for reasonable contact between the 6    deploying parent and the child after return from 7    deployment until the temporary order is terminated, even 8    if the time of contact exceeds the time the deploying 9    parent spent with the child before entry of the temporary 10    order; and11        (6) provide that the order will terminate pursuant to 12    Article 4 after the deploying parent returns from 13    deployment. 14    Section 310. Order for child support. If a court has 15issued an order granting caretaking authority under this 16Article, or an agreement granting caretaking authority has 17been executed under Article 2, the court may enter a temporary 18order for child support consistent with law of this State 19other than this Act if the court has jurisdiction under the 20Uniform Interstate Family Support Act. 21    Section 311. Modifying or terminating grant of custodial 22responsibility to nonparent.23    (a) Except for an order under Section 305, except as 24otherwise provided in subsection (b), and consistent with the   HB1280- 18 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. Appendix Sections 2521 and 522, on motion of a deploying or other parent or any 3nonparent to whom caretaking authority, decision-making 4authority, or limited contact has been granted, the court may 5modify or terminate the grant if the modification or 6termination is consistent with this Article and it is in the 7best interests of the child. A modification is temporary and 8terminates pursuant to Article 4 after the deploying parent 9returns from deployment, unless the grant has been terminated 10before that time by court order.11    (b) On motion of a deploying parent, the court shall 12terminate a grant of limited contact. 13Article 4. Return From Deployment 14    Section 401. Procedure for terminating temporary grant of 15custodial responsibility established by agreement.16    (a) At any time after return from deployment, a temporary 17agreement granting custodial responsibility under Article 2 18may be terminated by an agreement to terminate signed by the 19deploying parent and the other parent.20    (b) A temporary agreement under Article 2 granting 21custodial responsibility terminates:22        (1) if an agreement to terminate under subsection (a) 23    specifies a date for termination, on that date; or24        (2) if the agreement to terminate does not specify a   HB1280- 19 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1    date, on the date the agreement to terminate is signed by 2    the deploying parent and the other parent.3    (c) In the absence of an agreement under subsection (a) to 4terminate, a temporary agreement granting custodial 5responsibility terminates under Article 2 60 days after the 6deploying parent gives notice to the other parent that the 7deploying parent returned from deployment.8    (d) If a temporary agreement granting custodial 9responsibility was filed with a court pursuant to Section 205, 10an agreement to terminate the temporary agreement also must be 11filed with that court within a reasonable time after the 12signing of the agreement. The case number and heading of the 13case concerning custodial responsibility or child support must 14be provided to the court with the agreement to terminate. 15    Section 402. Consent procedure for terminating temporary 16grant of custodial responsibility established by court order. 17At any time after a deploying parent returns from deployment, 18the deploying parent and the other parent may file with the 19court an agreement to terminate a temporary order for 20custodial responsibility issued under Article 3. After an 21agreement has been filed, the court shall issue an order 22terminating the temporary order effective on the date 23specified in the agreement. If a date is not specified, the 24order is effective immediately.   HB1280- 20 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1    Section 403. Visitation before termination of temporary 2grant of custodial responsibility. After a deploying parent 3returns from deployment until a temporary agreement or order 4for custodial responsibility established under Article 2 or 3 5is terminated, the court shall issue a temporary order 6granting the deploying parent reasonable contact with the 7child unless it is contrary to the best interests of the child, 8even if the time of contact exceeds the time the deploying 9parent spent with the child before deployment. 10    Section 404. Termination by operation of law of temporary 11grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.12    (a) If an agreement between the parties to terminate a 13temporary order for custodial responsibility under Article 3 14has not been filed, the order terminates 60 days after the 15deploying parent gives notice to the other parent and any 16nonparent granted custodial responsibility that the deploying 17parent has returned from deployment.18    (b) A proceeding seeking to prevent termination of a 19temporary order for custodial responsibility is governed by 20law of this State other than this Act. 21Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions 22    Section 501. Uniformity of application and construction. 23In applying and construing this uniform Act, consideration   HB1280- 21 -LRB104 07539 JRC 17583 b1must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with 2respect to its subject matter among states that enact it. 3    Section 502. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global 4and National Commerce Act. This Act modifies, limits, or 5supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National 6Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does not 7modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that Act, 15 8U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of 9any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that Act, 15 10U.S.C. Section 7003(b). 11    Section 503. Saving clause. This Act does not affect the 12validity of a temporary court order concerning custodial 13responsibility during deployment which was entered before the 14effective date of this Act.